North Carolina statutes. Chapter 99E. Special Liability Provisions.
Article 7. Liability for Public Safety Telecommunicators and Dispatchers.

§ 99E-65.
Standard of proof.

In any civil action arising from any act or omission by the defendant in the performance of any lawful and prescribed actions pertaining to the defendant’s assigned job duties as a 911 or public safety telecommunicator or dispatcher at a primary public safety answering point as defined in G.S. 143B-1400 or at any public safety agency to which 911 calls are transferred from a primary PSAP as defined in 143B-1400 for dispatch of appropriate public safety agencies, the plaintiff’s burden of proof shall be by clear and convincing evidence.

History.

2015-71, s. 1.

§§ 99E-66 through 99E-69.

Reserved for future codification purposes.